Utah statutes.
70A-8-601.   Transition provisions.
(1)  This act does not affect an action or proceeding commenced before this
act takes effect.
(2)  If a security interest in a security is perfected at the date this act
takes effect, and the action by which the security interest was perfected
would suffice to perfect a security interest under this act, no further action
is required to continue perfection.  If a security interest in a security is
perfected at the date this act takes effect but the action by which the
security interest was perfected would not suffice to perfect a security
interest under this act, the security interest remains perfected for a period
of four months after the effective date and continues perfected thereafter if
appropriate action to perfect under this act is taken within that period.  If
a security interest is perfected at the date this act takes effect and the
security interest can be perfected by filing under this act, a financing
statement signed by the secured party instead of the debtor may be filed
within that period to continue perfection or thereafter to perfect.
